Vermont, session 2025-2026, H260.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4032 is added to read:
§ 4032. PROHIBITED SUBSTANCES
(a) As used in this section, “food” or “food product” means any raw,
cooked, or processed edible substances, including ice, beverage, or ingredient
used or intended in whole or in part for human consumption.
VT LEG #380040 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.260
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a person shall not manufacture, sell,
offer for sale, deliver, or distribute in commerce a food product for human
consumption that contains any of the following substances:
(1) brominated vegetable oil (CAS no. 8016-94-2);
(2) potassium bromate (CAS no. 7758-01-2);
(3) propylparaben (CAS no. 94-13-3); or
(4) red dye no. 3 (CAS no. 164423-68-0).
(c) The Attorney General may bring an action in the Civil Division of the
Washington Unit of the Superior Court for injunctive relief, costs, and
attorney’s fees and may impose on a person that violates this section a civil
penalty of not more than $5,000.00 for a first violation and not more than
$10,000.00 for each subsequent violation. The Attorney General shall have the
same authority to investigate and to obtain remedies under this section as if the
action were brought under the Consumer Protection Act, 9 V.S.A. chapter 63.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380040 v.1